District of Columbia statutes.
34-916

Notice; hearing to be conducted as though complaint had been filed.

Notice of the time and place for such hearing shall be given to the public utility and to such other interested persons as the Commission shall deem necessary, as provided in § 34-910, and thereafter proceedings shall be had and conducted in reference to the matter investigated in like manner as though complaint had been filed with the Commission relative to the matter investigated, and the same order or orders may be made in reference thereto as if such investigation had been made on complaint.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 984, ch. 150, § 8, par. 46

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-617.
1973 Ed., § 43-416.